New York, session 2025-2026, A11133.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Sections 1, 2 and 7 of chapter 10 of the laws of 1958, 2 relating to incorporating the Islip Terrace Volunteer Exempt Firemen's 3 Benevolent Association, and providing for its powers and duties, are 4 amended to read as follows: 5 Section 1. Incorporation; membership. A membership corporation by the 6 name of "Islip Terrace Volunteer Exempt [Firemen's] Firefighter's Benev- 7 olent Association" is hereby created. It shall be composed of such 8 persons eligible to membership therein as hereinafter provided as shall 9 (a) notify the secretary of the Islip Terrace fire department in writing 10 prior to the organization meeting of such corporation hereinafter 11 provided for their desire to become members, or (b) shall attend such 12 meeting or an adjournment thereof, and also such persons so eligible as 13 may become members of such corporation pursuant to its by-laws. 14 § 2. Persons eligible to membership. All persons who are now, or have 15 been, or who hereafter shall be volunteer members of the Islip Terrace 16 fire district fire department, or of any fire corporation in such fire 17 district, and all persons resident in such fire district or in territory 18 provided with fire protection by contract with such fire district who 19 are exempt volunteer [firemen] firefighters as defined by section two 20 hundred of the general municipal law, shall be eligible to membership in 21 the corporation hereby created; provided that any person who has been 22 expelled or removed for cause from membership in any fire company or 23 department shall not be eligible to membership in such corporation. 24 Whenever a member who is not an exempt [fireman] firefighter as defined 25 by section two hundred of the general municipal law shall move from such EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15581-02-6 A. 11133--A 2 1 fire district or from territory provided with fire protection as afore- 2 said or if the territory in which a member resides shall no longer be 3 provided with such fire protection, [his] their membership in such 4 corporation shall cease. 5 § 7. Precept for the payment of foreign fire insurance premium taxes. 6 Such corporation shall collect and there shall be paid to it all taxes 7 imposed by section [five hundred fifty-three] nine thousand one hundred 8 four of the insurance law for fire department use and benefit, upon 9 premiums for insurance against loss or damage by fire covering property 10 situated within the territory protected by the Islip Terrace fire 11 department, located in the town of Islip, Suffolk county, New York, or 12 within any duly organized territory in which the Islip Terrace fire 13 department is or may be obligated to render fire protection. The officer 14 of said corporation designated by its by-laws to collect and receive the 15 aforesaid tax shall have all the powers and be subject to all the 16 provisions of the insurance law, relating to treasurers of fire depart- 17 ments. Such corporation shall also be entitled to receive a share of the 18 tax imposed by section [five hundred fifty-four] nine thousand one 19 hundred five of the insurance law, based upon the business written in 20 the territory with respect to which it is entitled to collect and 21 receive the tax under section [five hundred fifty-three] nine thousand 22 one hundred four of the insurance law. Such taxes shall only be used 23 [for the care and relief of disabled or indigent volunteer and exempt 24 volunteer firemen and their families] in furtherance of its purposes as 25 set forth in section three of this act. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 27 the amendments to section 7 of chapter 10 of the laws of 1958 made by 28 section one of this act shall apply to taxes due on premiums received on 29 or after January 1, 2027.